New York, session 2025-2026, S2531.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 265.27 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 265.27 Certain injuries to be reported. 4 Every case of an injury arising from or caused by a bicycle with elec- 5 tric assist as defined in section one hundred two-c of the vehicle and 6 traffic law, an electric scooter as defined in section one hundred four- 7 teen-e of the vehicle and traffic law or a limited use motorcycle as 8 defined in section one hundred twenty-one-b of the vehicle and traffic 9 law, shall be reported at once to the police authorities of the city, 10 town or village where the person reporting is located by: (a) the physi- 11 cian attending or treating the case; or (b) the manager, superintendent 12 or other person in charge, whenever such case is treated in a hospital, 13 sanitarium or other institution. Failure to make such report is a class 14 A misdemeanor. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05548-01-5